Hawaii statutes.
§236E-6 Applicable exclusion amounts. (a)
An exclusion from a Hawaii taxable estate shall be allowed to the estate of
every decedent against the tax imposed by section 236E-8. For the purpose of
this section, the applicable exclusion amount is the same as the federal
applicable exclusion amount, the exemption equivalent of the unified credit reduced
by the amount of taxable gifts made by the decedent that reduces the amount of
the federal applicable exclusion amount, or the exemption equivalent of the unified
credit on the decedent's federal estate tax return, as set forth for the
decedent in chapter 11 of the Internal Revenue Code as further adjusted below:

(1) For residents, 100 per cent of the applicable
exclusion amount;

(2) For nonresidents, an amount computed by
multiplying the applicable exclusion amount by a fraction, the numerator of
which is the value of the property in the State subject to tax under this
chapter, and the denominator of which is the federal gross estate; and

(3) For nonresidents not citizens, an amount computed
by multiplying the exemption equivalent of the unified credit by a fraction,
the numerator of which is the value of the property in the State subject to tax
under this chapter, and the denominator of which is the federal gross estate.

(b)(1) For the purposes of this chapter, every decedent
having property in the State shall be presumed to have died a resident of the
State. The burden of proof in an estate tax proceeding shall be upon any
decedent's estate claiming exemption from the tax imposed by this chapter by
reason of the decedent's alleged nonresidency;

(2) Any person required to make and file a tax return
under this chapter, who believes that the decedent died a nonresident of the
State, may file a request for determination of domicile in writing with the
department, stating the specific grounds upon which the request is founded,
provided:

(A) The person has filed the return required
under this chapter;

(B) At least two hundred seventy days, but no
more than three years, have elapsed since the due date of the return or, if
applicable, the extended due date of the return;

(C) The person has not been notified, in
writing, by the department that a written agreement of compromise with the
taxing authorities of another jurisdiction, under section 236E-24, is being
negotiated; and

(D) The department has not previously
determined whether the decedent died a resident of the State;

(3) Not later than one hundred eighty days following
receipt of a request for determination, the department shall determine whether
the decedent died a resident or a nonresident of the State. If the department
commences negotiations over a written agreement of compromise with the taxing
authorities of another jurisdiction after a request for determination of
domicile is filed, the one hundred eighty day period shall be tolled for the
duration of the negotiations. If, before the expiration of the one hundred
eighty day period, both the department and the person required to make and file
a tax return under this chapter have consented in writing to the making of a
determination after such time, the determination may be made at any time prior
to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period agreed upon may be
extended by subsequent agreements; provided that the agreements are made in
writing before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon;

(4) The department shall mail notice of the proposed
determination to the person required to make and file a tax return under this
chapter. The notice shall briefly set forth the department's findings of fact
and the basis of decision in each case decided adversely to the person. Sixty
days after the date on which it is mailed, a notice of proposed determination
shall constitute a final determination, unless the person required to make and
file a tax return under this chapter has filed an appeal of the determination
as provided in section 236E-18; and

(5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
relieve any person filing a request for determination of domicile of the
obligation to pay the correct amount of tax on or before the due date of the
tax. [L 2012, c 220, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 60, §3;
am L 2014, c 44, §3]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to decedents dying or taxable transfers
occurring after December 31, 2013. L 2014, c 44, §5.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next